Utah statutes.
64-13-18.   Copy of sentence of incarceration.
The officer delivering any offender for incarceration shall deliver to the
department a certified copy of the sentence received by the officer from the
clerk of the court.  The department shall give the officer a certificate of
delivery and shall submit to the Board of Pardons and Parole a copy of the
commitment order.  The certified copy of sentence is conclusive evidence of
the facts contained in it.
